Massachusetts, session 194th, S255.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 119 of Chapter 112, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by adding at the end thereof the following new paragraph:-
The board shall, by no later than July 1, 2026, establish a senior psychologist category of
licensure to facilitate the licensure of psychologists who hold a doctoral degree in psychology
and have been licensed and practicing as a psychologist in another state for an extended period of
time, but whose paper records of training and education may no longer be available.
The board shall, by regulation, determine the requirements for licensure as a senior
psychologist. Such requirements shall specify the regionally accredited institution granting the
doctoral degree in psychology; the number of years an applicant has been licensed by one or
of 2

more states or provincial psychology boards that are members of the Association of State and
Provincial Psychology Boards; the number of years the applicant has engaged in the practice of
psychology immediately prior to the date of application; and the number of years prior to the
date of application during which the applicant has been free from any disciplinary sanctions.
The board may include requirements for senior psychologists that are comparable to
those required of other applicants, such as the requirement to take the state jurisprudence exam,
provided they do not add an unreasonable or undue burden on the senior psychologist applicant.
of 2